California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(d) The department shall adopt regulations to implement this section by June 30, 2006. The department shall seek input from the entities listed in Section 12305.72 when developing the regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 229, Sec. 43.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.21.

(a) The department shall, in consultation and coordination with the county welfare departments and in accordance with Section 12305.72, develop for statewide use a standard form on which to obtain certification by a physician or other appropriate medical professional as determined by the department of a person’s need for protective supervision.

(b) At the time of an initial assessment at which a recipient’s potential need for protective supervision has been identified, the
 county shall request that a person requesting protective supervision submit the certification to the county. The county shall use the certification in conjunction with other pertinent information to assess the person’s need for protective supervision. The certification submitted by the person shall be considered as one indicator of the need for protective supervision, but shall not be determinative. In the event that the person fails to submit the certification, the county shall make its determination of need based upon other available evidence.

(c) At the time of reassessment of a person receiving authorized protective supervision, the county shall determine the need to obtain a new certification. The county may request another certification from a recipient if determined necessary. The county shall document the basis for its determination in the recipient’s case file.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, until emergency regulations are filed with the Secretary of State, the department may implement this section through all-county letters or similar instructions from the director. The department shall adopt emergency regulations implementing this chapter no later than September 30, 2005, unless notification of a delay is made to the Chair of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee prior to that date. The notification shall include the reason for the delay, the current status of the emergency regulations, a date by which the emergency regulations shall be adopted, and a statement of need to continue use of all-county letters or similar instructions. Under no circumstances shall the adoption of emergency regulations be delayed, or the use of all-county letters or similar instructions be
 extended, beyond June 30, 2006.

(2) The adoption of regulations implementing this section shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days by which time final regulations shall be promulgated. The department shall seek input from the entities listed in Section 12305.72 when developing all-county letters or similar instructions and the regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 229, Sec. 44.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.22.

On or before December 31, 2011, the department, in consultation with county welfare departments and other stakeholders, shall develop a process to ensure that a provider of services under this article receives a list specifying the approved duties to be performed for each recipient under the provider’s care and a complete list of supportive service tasks available under the IHSS program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 17, Sec. 2.   (AB 19 4x)   Effective October 23, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.24.

(a) All prospective providers shall complete an in-person provider orientation at the time of enrollment, as developed by the department, in consultation with counties, which shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The requirements to be an eligible IHSS provider.

(2) A description of the IHSS program.

(3) The rules, regulations, and provider-related processes and procedures, including timesheets.

(4) The consequences of committing fraud in the IHSS program.

(5) The Medi-Cal toll-free telephone fraud hotline and internet website for reporting suspected fraud or abuse in the provision or receipt of supportive services.

(6) The applicable federal and state requirements regarding minimum wage and overtime pay, including paid travel time and wait time, and the requirements of Section 12300.4.

(b) In order to complete provider enrollment, at the conclusion of the provider orientation, all applicants shall sign a statement specifying that the
 provider agrees to all of the following:

(1) The prospective provider will provide to a recipient the authorized services.

(2) The prospective provider has received a demonstration of, and understands, timesheet requirements, including content, signature, and fingerprinting, when implemented.

(3) The prospective provider shall cooperate with state or county staff to provide any information necessary for assessment or evaluation of a case.

(4) The prospective provider understands and agrees to program expectations and is aware of the measures that the state or county may take to enforce program integrity.

(5) The prospective provider has attended the provider orientation and understands
 that failure to comply with program rules and requirements may result in the provider being terminated from providing services through the IHSS program.

(c) The county shall indefinitely retain this statement in the provider’s file. Refusal of the provider to sign the statement described in subdivision (b) shall result in the provider being ineligible to receive payment for the provision of services and participate as a provider in the IHSS program.

(d) All of the following shall apply to the provider orientation described in subdivision (a):

(1) (A) The orientation shall be an onsite orientation that all prospective providers shall attend in person.

(B) (i) If the state or local public health agency issues an order limiting the size of gatherings, a county may hold a series of smaller in-person orientations that meet the same criteria specified in this section. A county is not required to hold an
 orientation in which prospective providers attend in person if the state or local health agency issues an order that prevents the in-person orientation from occurring.

(ii) If an orientation is not required to be held in person pursuant to clause (i), the county shall hold an orientation that is in person within 30 calendar days of the date that the public health order restrictions are lifted. Counties or IHSS public authorities may provide a written attestation to the recognized employee organization if public health conditions cause staffing or facility challenges that cause delays, and such an attestation will result in a one-time extension of 15 calendar days for the return to in-person orientations.

(C) The requirement for the orientation to be held in person and
 prospective providers to attend the orientation in person shall not apply if parties to a collective bargaining agreement expressly agree to waive that requirement and have a negotiated alternative method for the provision of the orientation.

(2) Prospective providers may attend the onsite orientation only after completing the application for the IHSS provider enrollment process described in subdivision (a) of Section 12305.81.

(3) Any oral presentation and written materials presented at the orientation shall be translated into all IHSS threshold languages in the county.

(4) (A) Representatives of the recognized employee organization in the county shall be permitted to make a presentation of up to 30 minutes at the beginning of the orientation. Prior to implementing the
 orientation requirements set forth in this subdivision, counties shall provide at least the level of access to, and the ability to make presentations at, provider orientations that they allowed the recognized employee organization in the county as of September 1, 2014. Counties shall not discourage prospective providers from attending, participating, or listening to the orientation presentation of the recognized employee organization. Prospective providers may, by their own accord, choose not to participate in the recognized employee organization presentation.

(B) Prior to scheduling a provider orientation, the county shall provide the recognized employee organization in the county with not less than 10 days advance notice of the planned date, time, and location of the orientation. If, within 3 business days of receiving that notice, the recognized employee organization notifies the county of its unavailability for the planned orientation, the
 county shall make reasonable efforts to schedule the orientation so the recognized employee organization can attend, so long as rescheduling the orientation does not delay provider enrollment by more than 10 business days. The requirement to make reasonable efforts to reschedule may be waived, as necessary, due to a natural disaster or other declared state of emergency, or by mutual agreement between the county and the recognized employee organization.

(C) Prior to the orientation, the recognized employee organization shall be provided with the information described in subdivision (b) of Section 7926.300 of the Government Code for prospective providers.

(e) To the extent that the orientation is modified from an onsite and in-person orientation, as required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), the recognized employee organization in the county shall be provided with the same right to make a presentation, the same advance notice of scheduling, and the same information regarding the applicants, providers, or prospective providers who will attend the orientation, as the organization would receive for an onsite orientation.

(f) A claim may be brought before the Public Employment Relations Board for an alleged violation of Section 3550 of the Government Code if the county has not complied with the requirements
 of this section within 30 days of being notified by the recognized employee organization.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 59) and amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 438) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 60.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.25.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the standardized provider timesheet used to track the work performed by providers of services under this article shall contain both of the following:

(1) A certification to be signed by the provider and recipient, verifying that the information provided in the timesheet is true and correct.

(2) A statement that the provider or recipient may be subject to civil penalties if the information provided is found not to be true and correct.

(b) A person who is convicted of fraud, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 12305.8, resulting from intentional deception or misrepresentation in the provision of timesheet information under this section shall, in addition to any criminal penalties imposed, be subject to a civil penalty of at least five hundred dollars ($500), but not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), for each violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 649, Sec. 1.   (SB 930)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.3.

(a) Each county may appoint an in-home supportive services advisory committee that shall be comprised of not more than 11 individuals. No less than 50 percent of the membership of the advisory committee shall be individuals who are current or past users of personal assistance services paid for through public or private funds or as recipients of services under this article.

(1) (A) In counties with fewer than 500 recipients of services provided pursuant to this article or Section 14132.95, at least one member of the advisory committee shall be a current or former provider of in-home supportive services.

(B) In counties with 500 or more recipients of services provided pursuant to this article or Section 14132.95, at least two members of the advisory committee shall be a current or former provider of in-home supportive services.

(2) Individuals who represent organizations that advocate for people with disabilities or seniors may be appointed to committees under this section.

(3) Individuals from community-based organizations that advocate on behalf of home care employees may be appointed to committees
 under this section.

(4) A county board of supervisors shall not appoint more than one county employee as a member of the advisory committee, but may designate any county employee to provide ongoing advice and support to the advisory committee.

(b) Prior to the appointment of members to a committee authorized by subdivision (a), the county board of supervisors shall solicit recommendations for qualified members through a fair and open process that includes the provision of reasonable written notice to, and reasonable response time by, members of the general public and interested persons and organizations.

(c) The advisory committee shall submit recommendations to the county board of supervisors on the preferred mode or modes of service to be utilized in the county for in-home supportive services.

(d) Any county that has established a governing body, as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 12301.6, prior to July 1, 2000, shall not be required to comply with the composition requirements of subdivision (a) and shall be deemed to be in compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 8, Sec. 32.   (SB 72)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.4.

Each advisory committee established pursuant to Section 12301.3 or 12301.6 shall provide ongoing advice and recommendations regarding in-home supportive services to the county board of supervisors, any administrative body in the county that is related to the delivery and administration of in-home supportive services, and the governing body and administrative agency of the public authority, nonprofit consortium, contractor, and
 public employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 8, Sec. 33.   (SB 72)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.5.

The department may secure to the extent feasible such in-home supportive and other health services for persons eligible under this article to which they are entitled under the Medi-Cal Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of this part).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 12302 and 12302.1, a county board of supervisors may, at its option, elect to do either of the following:

(1) Contract with a nonprofit consortium to provide for the delivery of in-home supportive services.

(2) Establish, by ordinance, a public authority to provide for the delivery of in-home supportive services.

(b) (1) To the extent that a county elects to establish a public authority pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the enabling ordinance shall specify the membership of the governing body of the public authority, the qualifications for individual members, the manner of
 appointment, selection, or removal of members, how long they shall serve, and other matters as the board of supervisors deems necessary for the operation of the public authority.

(2) A public authority established pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be both of the following:

(A) An entity separate from the county, and shall be required to file the statement required by Section 53051 of the Government Code.

(B) A corporate public body, exercising public and essential governmental functions and that has all powers necessary or convenient to carry out the delivery of in-home supportive services, including the power to contract for services pursuant to Sections 12302 and 12302.1 and that makes or provides for direct payment to a provider chosen by the recipient for the purchase of services pursuant to
 Sections 12302 and 12302.2. Employees of the public authority shall not be employees of the county for any purpose.

(3) (A) As an alternative, the enabling ordinance may designate the board of supervisors as the governing body of the public authority.

(B) Any enabling ordinance that designates the board of supervisors as the governing body of the public authority shall also specify that no fewer than 50 percent of the membership of the advisory committee shall be individuals who are current or past users of personal assistance services paid for through public or private funds or recipients of services under this article.

(C) If the enabling ordinance designates the board of supervisors as the governing body of the public authority, it shall also require the appointment of an advisory committee
 of not more than 11 individuals who shall be designated in accordance with subparagraph (B).

(D) Prior to making designations of committee members pursuant to subparagraph (C), or governing body members in accordance with paragraph (4), the board of supervisors shall solicit recommendations of qualified members of either the governing body of the public authority or of any advisory committee through a fair and open process that includes the provision of reasonable written notice to, and a reasonable response time by, members of the general public and interested persons and organizations.

(4) If the enabling ordinance does not designate the board of supervisors as the governing body of the public authority, the enabling ordinance shall require the membership of the governing body to meet the requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3).

(c) (1) Any public authority created pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be the employer of in-home supportive services personnel referred to recipients under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) within the meaning of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code. Recipients shall retain the right to hire, fire, and supervise the work of any in-home supportive services personnel providing services to them.

(2) (A) Any nonprofit consortium contracting with a county pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be the employer of in-home supportive services personnel referred to recipients pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) for the purposes of collective bargaining over wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment.

(B) Recipients shall retain the right to hire, fire, and supervise the work of any in-home supportive services personnel providing services for them.

(d) A public authority established pursuant to this section or a nonprofit consortium contracting with a county pursuant to this section, when providing for the delivery of services under this article by contract in accordance with Sections 12302 and 12302.1, by direct payment to a provider chosen by a recipient in accordance with Sections 12302 and 12302.2, or by way of a provider of waiver personal care services provided pursuant to Section 14132.97, shall comply with and be subject to, all statutory and regulatory provisions applicable to the respective delivery mode.

(e) Any nonprofit consortium contracting with a county pursuant to this section or any public authority established pursuant to this section shall
 provide for all of the following functions under this article, but shall not be limited to those functions:

(1) The provision of assistance to recipients in finding in-home supportive services personnel or waiver personal care services authorized pursuant to Section 14132.97 through the establishment of a registry.

(2) (A) (i) The investigation of the qualifications and background of potential personnel. Upon the effective date of the amendments to this section made during the 2009–10 Fourth Extraordinary Session of the Legislature, the investigation with respect to any provider in the registry or prospective registry applicant shall include criminal background checks requested by the nonprofit consortium or public authority and conducted by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 15660, for those public authorities or nonprofit
 consortia using the agencies on the effective date of the amendments to this section made during the 2009–10 Fourth Extraordinary Session of the Legislature. Criminal background checks shall be performed no later than July 1, 2010, for any provider who is already on the registry on the effective date of amendments to this section made during the 2009–10 Fourth Extraordinary Session of the Legislature, for whom a criminal background check pursuant to this section has not previously been provided, as a condition of the provider’s continued enrollment in the IHSS program or the program authorizing waiver personal care services pursuant to Section 14132.97. Criminal background checks shall be conducted at the provider’s expense.

(ii) Upon notice from the Department of Justice notifying the public authority or nonprofit consortium that the prospective registry applicant has been convicted of a criminal offense specified in Section 12305.81, the
 public authority or nonprofit consortium shall deny the request to be placed on the registry for providing supportive services to any recipient of in-home supportive services or waiver personal care services authorized pursuant to Section 14132.97.

(iii) Commencing 90 days after the effective date of the act that adds Section 12305.87, and upon notice from the Department of Justice that an applicant who is subject to the provisions of that section has been convicted of, or incarcerated following conviction for, an offense described in subdivision (b) of that section, the public authority or nonprofit consortium shall deny the applicant’s request to become a provider of supportive services to any recipient of in-home supportive services or waiver personal care services, subject to the individual waiver and exception processes described in that section. An applicant who is denied on the basis of Section 12305.87 shall be informed by the public
 authority or nonprofit consortium of the individual waiver and exception processes described in that section.

(B) (i) Notwithstanding any other law, the public authority or nonprofit consortium shall provide an individual with a copy of his or her state-level criminal offender record information search response as provided to the entity by the Department of Justice if the individual has been denied placement on the registry for providing supportive services to any recipient of the In-Home Supportive Services program or waiver personal care services based on this information. The copy of the state-level criminal offender record information search response shall be included with the individual’s notice of denial. Along with the notice of denial, the public authority or public consortium shall also provide information in plain language on how an individual may contest the accuracy and completeness of, and refute any erroneous
 or inaccurate information in, his or her state-level criminal offender record information search response as provided by the Department of Justice as authorized by Section 11126 of the Penal Code. The state-level criminal offender record information search response shall not be modified or altered from its form or content as provided by the Department of Justice.

(ii) The department shall develop a written appeal process for the current and prospective providers who are determined ineligible to receive payment for the provision of services in the In-Home Supportive Services program or waiver personal care services. Notwithstanding any other law, the public authority or nonprofit consortium shall provide the department with a copy of the state-level criminal offender record information search response as provided to the entity by the Department of Justice for any individual who has requested an appeal of a denial of placement on the registry for
 providing supportive services to any recipient of in-home supportive services or waiver personal care services based on clause (ii) or (iii) of subparagraph (A). The state-level criminal offender record information search response shall not be modified or altered from its form or content as provided by the Department of Justice and shall be provided to the address specified by the department in its written request.

(C) This paragraph does not prohibit the Department of Justice from assessing a fee pursuant to Section 11105 or 11123 of the Penal Code to cover the cost of furnishing summary criminal history information.

(D) As used in this section, “nonprofit consortium” means a nonprofit public benefit corporation that has all powers necessary to carry out the delivery of in-home supportive services or waiver personal care services under the delegated authority of a government
 entity.

(E) A nonprofit consortium or a public authority authorized to secure a criminal background check clearance pursuant to this section shall accept a clearance for an applicant described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) who has been deemed eligible by another nonprofit consortium, public authority, or county with criminal background check authority pursuant to either Section 12305.86 or this section, to receive payment for providing services pursuant to this article. Existence of a clearance shall be determined by verification through the case management, information, and payrolling system, that another county, nonprofit consortium, or public authority with criminal background check authority pursuant to Section 12305.86 or this section has deemed the current or prospective provider to be eligible to receive payment for providing services pursuant to this article.

(3) Establishment of a referral system under which in-home supportive services personnel or waiver personal care services personnel shall be referred to recipients.

(4) Providing for training for providers and recipients.

(5) (A) Performing any other functions related to the delivery of in-home supportive services or waiver personal care services.

(B) (i) Upon request of a recipient of in-home supportive services pursuant to this chapter, or a recipient of personal care services under the Medi-Cal program pursuant to Section 14132.95, a public authority or nonprofit consortium may provide a criminal background check on a nonregistry applicant or provider from the Department of Justice, in accordance with clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (e). If the person who is the subject of the criminal background check is not hired or is terminated because of the information contained in the criminal background report, the provisions of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) shall apply.

(ii) A recipient of in-home supportive services pursuant to this chapter or a recipient of personal care services under the Medi-Cal program may elect to employ an individual as their service provider notwithstanding the individual’s record of previous criminal convictions, unless those convictions include any of the offenses specified in Section 12305.81.

(6) Ensuring that the requirements of the personal care option pursuant to Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code are met.

(f) (1) Any nonprofit consortium contracting with a county pursuant to this section or any public authority created pursuant to this section shall be deemed not to be the employer of in-home supportive services personnel or waiver personal care services personnel referred to recipients under this section for purposes of liability due to the negligence or intentional torts of the in-home supportive services personnel or waiver personal care services personnel.

(2) A nonprofit consortium contracting with a county pursuant to this section or any public authority created pursuant to this section is not liable for the action or omission of any in-home supportive services personnel or waiver personal care services personnel whom the nonprofit consortium or public authority did not list on its registry or otherwise refer to a recipient.

(3) Counties and the state shall be
 immune from any liability resulting from their implementation of this section in the administration of the In-Home Supportive Services program or in the administration of waiver personal care services authorized under Section 14132.97. Any obligation of the public authority or consortium pursuant to this section, whether statutory, contractual, or otherwise, shall be the obligation solely of the public authority or nonprofit consortium, and shall not be the obligation of the county or state.

(g) Any nonprofit consortium contracting with a county pursuant to this section shall ensure that it has a governing body that complies with the requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) or an advisory committee that complies with subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(h) Recipients of services under this section may elect to receive services
 from in-home supportive services personnel or waiver personal care services personnel who are not referred to them by the public authority or nonprofit consortium. Those personnel shall be referred to the public authority or nonprofit consortium for the purposes of wages, benefits, and other terms and conditions of employment.

(i) (1) This section does not affect the state’s responsibility with respect to the state payroll system, unemployment insurance, or workers’ compensation and other provisions of Section 12302.2 for providers of in-home supportive services or for individuals who are employed by a recipient of waiver personal care services authorized under Section 14132.97.

(2) The Controller shall make any deductions from the wages of in-home supportive services personnel or waiver personal care services personnel, who are employees of a public
 authority pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), that are agreed to by that public authority in collective bargaining with the designated representative of the in-home supportive services personnel or waiver personal care services personnel pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code and transfer the deducted funds as directed in that agreement.

(3) Any county that elects to provide in-home supportive services pursuant to this section shall be responsible for any increased costs to the in-home supportive services case management, information, and payrolling system attributable to that election. The department shall collaborate with any county that elects to provide in-home supportive services pursuant to this section prior to implementing the amount of financial obligation for which the county shall be responsible.

(j) To the extent permitted by federal law, personal care option funds, obtained pursuant to Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, along with matching funds using the state and county sharing ratio established in subdivision (c) of Section 12306, or any other funds that are obtained pursuant to Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, may be used to establish and operate an entity authorized by this section.

(k) Notwithstanding any other law, the county, in exercising its option to establish a public authority, shall not be subject to competitive bidding requirements. However, contracts entered into by either the county, a public authority, or a nonprofit consortium pursuant to this section shall be subject to competitive bidding as otherwise required by law.

(l) (1) The department may adopt regulations implementing this section as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For the purposes of the Administrative Procedure Act, the adoption of the regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, these emergency regulations shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (h) of Section 11346.1 and Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the department shall transmit these regulations directly to the Secretary of State for filing. The regulations shall become effective immediately upon
 filing by the Secretary of State.

(3) Except as otherwise provided for by Section 10554, the Office of Administrative Law shall provide for the printing and publication of these regulations in the California Code of Regulations. Emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days.

(m) (1) If a county elects to form a nonprofit consortium or public authority pursuant to subdivision (a) before the State Department of Health Care Services has obtained all necessary federal approvals pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (j) of Section 14132.95, all of the following shall apply:

(A) Subdivision (d) shall apply only to those matters that do not require federal approval.

(B) The
 second sentence of subdivision (h) shall not be operative.

(C) The nonprofit consortium or public authority shall not provide services other than those specified in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) of subdivision (e).

(2) Paragraph (1) shall become inoperative when the State Department of Health Care Services has obtained all necessary federal approvals pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (j) of Section 14132.95.

(n) (1) One year after the effective date of the first approval by the department granted to the first public authority, the Bureau of State Audits shall commission a study to review the performance of that public authority.

(2) The study shall be submitted to the Legislature and the Governor not later than two
 years after the effective date of the approval specified in subdivision (a). The study shall give special attention to the health and welfare of the recipients under the public authority, including the degree to which all required services have been delivered, out-of-home placement rates, prompt response to recipient complaints, and any other issue the director deems relevant.

(3) The report shall make recommendations to the Legislature and the Governor for any changes to this section that will further ensure the well-being of recipients and the most efficient delivery of required services.

(o) Commencing July 1, 1997, the department shall provide annual reports to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature on the efficacy of the implementation of this section, and shall include an assessment of the quality of care provided pursuant to this section.

(p) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, and except as provided in paragraph (2), the department shall, no later than January 1, 2009, implement subparagraphs (A) and (B) through an all-county letter from the director:

(A) Subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e).

(B) Subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (e).

(2) The department shall, no later than July 1, 2009, adopt regulations to implement subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1).

(q) The amendments made to paragraphs (2) and (5) of subdivision (e) made by the act that added this subdivision during the 2007–08 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be implemented only to the extent
 that an appropriation is made in the annual Budget Act or other statute, except for the amendments that added subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), which shall go into effect January 1, 2009.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 35, Sec. 32.   (AB 1811)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.61.

(a) On or after October 1, 2023, if a public authority or nonprofit consortium established pursuant to Section 12301.6, acting as the employer of record, and the employee organization have not reached an agreement on a bargaining contract with in-home supportive services workers, either party may request mediation, pursuant to Section 3505.2 of the Government Code, which shall be mandatory. If the parties fail to agree on a mediator, the Public Employment Relations Board shall appoint one from the pool described in subdivision (c). The mediation shall be held no more than 15 business days from the date requested by either party.

(b) If the parties are unable to effect settlement through mediation, as described in subdivision (a), the parties shall submit
 their differences to factfinding, pursuant to Sections 3505 and 3505.4 of the Government Code. Alternatively, either party may opt to bypass the mediation process in subdivision (a) and move directly to factfinding.

(1) The factfinding panel shall make findings of fact and recommend terms of settlement, which shall be advisory only, within 30 days after the panel is appointed by the Public Employment Relations Board.

(2) Within 15 days after the factfinding panel has released its findings of fact and recommended settlement terms, the parties may, by mutual agreement, request postfactfinding mediation consistent with Section 3505.2 of the Government Code. If the parties fail to agree on a mediator, the Public Employment Relations Board shall appoint one from the pool described in subdivision (c).

(3) If the parties
 elect postfactfinding mediation, the findings of fact and recommended settlement terms shall not be made public until the mediation has concluded. If either party declines to elect postfactfinding mediation, the findings of fact and recommended settlement terms shall be made public immediately.

(4) Mediation shall be held no more than 15 days from the date requested, and may include, at the mediator’s discretion, the factfinding panel and representatives of both parties. The director, or the director’s designee, shall be available to provide information and expertise, as necessary.

(5) The county board of supervisors shall hold a public hearing within 30 days of the factfinding panel’s public release of its findings of fact and recommended settlement terms.

(c) The Public Employment Relations Board shall designate a
 pool of no more than five qualified individuals to serve as mediators or on a factfinding panel. The pool shall consist of individuals with relevant subject matter expertise. The board shall select individuals for the pool in consultation with the department and the affected employers and employee organizations. Priority shall be given to individuals with knowledge of the In-Home Supportive Services program. The board may designate the mediator to serve as the neutral member of the factfinding panel.
